District of Columbia statutes.
32-1202

Amount of leave; denial; form; notice.

(a)

Except as provided in this section, an employee who is a parent shall be entitled to a total of 24 hours leave during any 12 month period to attend or participate in a school-related event for his or her child.

(b)

Except as provided in this section, an employee shall be entitled to a day of leave each year on April 16th, the District of Columbia Emancipation Day.

(c)

An employer may deny the use of leave provided by subsections (a) and (b) of this section only if the granting of leave would disrupt the employer’s business and make the achievement of production or service delivery unusually difficult.

(d)

The leave provided by this section may consist of unpaid leave unless the parent or employee elects to use any paid family, vacation, personal, compensatory, or leave bank leave that has been provided by the employer.

(e)

An employee shall notify the employer of the desire for leave to attend a school-related event or to celebrate the District of Columbia Emancipation Day at least 10 calendar days in advance, unless, in the case of a school event, the need to attend the school-related event cannot be reasonably foreseen.

Aug. 17, 1994, D.C. Law 10-146, § 3, 41 DCR 4477
Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-237, § 4(b), 48 DCR 597

History

This section is referenced in § 32-1203.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 36-1602.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 13-237 rewrote the section which had read:
“(a) Except as provided in this section, an employee who is a parent shall be entitled to a total of 24 hours leave during any 12 month period to attend or participate in school-related events for his or her child.
“(b) An employer may deny the leave provided by subsection (a) of this section only if the granting of leave would disrupt the employer’s business and make the achievement of production or service delivery unusually difficult.
“(c) The leave provided by this section may consist of unpaid leave unless the parent elects to use any paid family, vacation, personal, compensatory, or leave bank leave that has been provided by the employer.
“(d) Any employee shall notify the employer of the desire for leave to attend a school-related event at least 10 calendar days prior to the event, unless the need to attend the school-related event cannot be reasonably foreseen.”

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see §§ 2, 4(a) of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Temporary Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-152, July 18, 2000, law notification 47 DCR 6102).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (90-day) authorization of legislative findings, see § 2 of the District of Columbia Emancipation Day Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-307, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2710).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of the District of Columbia Emancipation Day Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-307, April 7, 2000, 47 DCR 2710).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 4(b) of District of Columbia Emancipation Day Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-20, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2699).

Emergency Legislation